Utah statutes.
73-26-102.   Findings.
(1)  The Legislature finds that:
(a)  the Board of Water Resources has significant filings for water of the
Bear River that could be developed;
(b)  the continued growth and prosperity of communities in the Bear River
Basin and the Wasatch Front will be enhanced by the development and
utilization of the Bear River, one of the last major sources of developable
water in the state; and
(c)  Bear River water developed by the state should be apportioned in an
equitable manner taking into consideration:
(i)  the increasing water needs of the state's growing urban population; and
(ii)  preservation of future supplies for areas:
(A)  where the water originates; or
(B)  that are adjacent to the water and can be conveniently supplied by it.
(2)  Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to:
(a)  direct the Division of Water Resources to develop the surface waters of
the Bear River and its tributaries covered by filings of the board, filings
acquired from the Bureau of Reclamation, or new filings, as approved by the
state engineer;
(b)  allocate the developed waters among various regions and entities; and
(c)  provide protection for existing rights.
(3)  Nothing in this chapter shall:
(a)  cover groundwater; or
(b)  be construed to prevent any person from developing:
(i)  groundwater pursuant to state law; or
(ii)  the surface waters of the Bear River or its tributaries at any site
including sites studied by the state.
